Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1471
Aircraft; operation while under influence of liquor or drug; chemical test; law enforcement officer; powers.

Any law enforcement officer who has been duly authorized to make arrests for violations of traffic laws of this state or of ordinances of any city or village may require any person arrested for any offense arising out of acts alleged to have been committed while the person was operating or was in actual physical control of an aircraft while under the influence of alcoholic liquor to submit to a chemical test of his or her blood or breath for the purpose of determining the alcoholic content of his or her body fluid, when the officer has reasonable grounds to believe that such person was operating or was in the actual physical control of an aircraft within this state while under the influence of alcoholic liquor.

Laws 1978, LB 903, § 7;

Laws 2001, LB 773, § 4.